tests/data/bidix-epsilons-bi.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="m" />
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
<e>       <p><l>aa<s n="vblex"/></l><r>aa<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>aa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/></l><r>aa</r></p><par n="__n"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/></l><r>ba</r></p><par n="__n"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
